Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 3
JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

7-80-809. Approval by judicial act. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2272, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1464, § 196, effective July 1.

7-80-810. Judicial dissolution.

A limited liability company may be dissolved in a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established that:

The limited liability company obtained its articles of organization through fraud; or

The limited liability company has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

A limited liability company may be dissolved in a proceeding by or for a member or manager of the limited liability company if it is established that it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business of the limited liability company in conformity with the operating agreement of said company.

A limited liability company may be dissolved in a proceeding by a creditor of the limited liability company if it is established that:

The creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, execution upon such judgment has been returned unsatisfied, and the limited liability company is insolvent; or

The limited liability company is insolvent and the limited liability company has admitted in writing that the creditor's claim is due and owing.

If a limited liability company has been dissolved by voluntary action taken under subpart 1 of this part 8:

The limited liability company may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-80-803; and

The attorney general, a member, a manager, or a creditor, as the case may be, may bring a proceeding to wind up and liquidate the business and affairs of the limited liability company under judicial supervision in accordance with section 7-80-803, upon establishing the grounds set forth for such person, respectively, in subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

As used in sections 7-80-811 to 7-80-813, a "judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a limited liability company" includes a proceeding brought under this subsection (4), and a "decree of dissolution" includes an order of court entered in a proceeding under this subsection (4) that directs that the business and affairs of a limited liability company shall be wound up and liquidated under judicial supervision.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2273, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1464, § 197, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 1219, § 28, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-808 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-811. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

A judicial proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a limited liability company shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the limited liability company's principal office or the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the limited liability company has no principal office in this state and no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver. A judicial proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-80-810 to dissolve a limited liability company shall be brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the limited liability company's principal office is located or, if it has no principal office in this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the limited liability company has no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

It is not necessary to make managers or members parties to a judicial proceeding to dissolve a limited liability company unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a limited liability company may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the limited liability company's assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the limited liability company until a full hearing can be held.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2274, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 198, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 864, § 37, effective July 1.

7-80-812. Receivership or custodianship.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a limited liability company may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the business and affairs of the limited liability company. The court shall hold a hearing, after giving notice to all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the limited liability company and all of its property, wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual, a domestic entity, or a foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver:

May dispose of all or any part of the property of the limited liability company wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

May sue and defend in the receiver's own name as receiver of the limited liability company in all courts; or

The custodian, with the authority of a manager of a limited liability company, the articles of organization of which provide that it is to be managed by managers, may exercise all of the powers of the limited liability company, through or in place of its managers or members, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the limited liability company in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the limited liability company and its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and such person's counsel from the assets of the limited liability company or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2274, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(3)(b) amended, p. 864, § 38, effective July 1.

7-80-813. Decree of dissolution.

If, in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a limited liability company, after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in section 7-80-810 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the limited liability company and stating the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the limited liability company's business and affairs in accordance with section 7-80-803 and the giving of notice to claimants in accordance with sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2275, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1465, § 199, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 864, § 39, effective July 1.